Utah statutes.
63C-9-601.   Responsibility for items.

Furniture, furnishings, fixtures, works of art, and decorative objects for which the board has responsibility under this chapter are not subject to the custody or control of the State Library Board, State Library Division, the Division of Archives and Records Service, the Division of State History, the Office of Museum Services, the Utah Arts Council, the Division of Arts and Museums, the Alice Art Collection Committee, or any other state agency.

